Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.09, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Enrollment priority. (a) A postsecondary institution must give priority to its postsecondary students when enrolling pupils in grades 10, 11, and 12 in its courses. A postsecondary institution may provide information about its programs to a secondary school or to a pupil or parent and it may advertise or otherwise recruit or solicit a secondary pupil to enroll in its programs on educational and programmatic grounds only except, notwithstanding other law to the contrary, and for the 2014-2015 through 2019-2020 school years only, an eligible postsecondary institution may advertise or otherwise recruit or solicit a secondary pupil residing in a school district with 700 students or more in grades 10, 11, and 12, to enroll in its programs on educational, programmatic, or financial grounds. (b) An institution must not enroll secondary pupils, for postsecondary enrollment options purposes, in remedial, developmental, or other courses that are not college level except when a student eligible to participate and enrolled in the graduation incentives program under section 124D.68 enrolls full time in a middle or early college program. A middle or early college program must be specifically designed to allow the student to earn dual high school and college credit with a well-defined pathway to allow the student to earn a postsecondary degree or credential. In this case, the student must receive developmental college credit and not college credit for completing remedial or developmental courses. (c) Once a pupil has been enrolled in any postsecondary course under this section, the pupil must not be displaced by another student. (d) If a postsecondary institution enrolls a secondary school pupil in a course under this section, the postsecondary institution also must enroll in the same course an otherwise enrolled and qualified postsecondary student who qualifies as a veteran under section 197.447, and demonstrates to the postsecondary institution's satisfaction that the institution's established enrollment timelines were not practicable for that student. (e) A postsecondary institution must allow secondary pupils to enroll in online courses under this section consistent with the institution's policy regarding postsecondary pupil enrollment in online courses. new text begin (f) A postsecondary institution must allow a secondary pupil to enroll in a summer course under this section consistent with the institution's policy regarding postsecondary pupil enrollment in summer courses. new text end